Massachusetts, session 194th, S2705.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 of chapter 142 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “thereof”, in line 9, the following
words:- ; and provided further, that, notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
grounds for such variances by examiners may include the advancement of reductions in
greenhouse gas emissions needed to advance the health of building occupants and reductions in
greenhouse gas emissions needed to meet the statewide greenhouse gas emissions limits and
sublimits established in chapter 21N.
SECTION 2. Said section 13 of said chapter 142, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “thereof”, in line 24, the following words:- ; provided,
however, that notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the contrary,
grounds for making, altering, amending and repealing such rules and regulations may include the
advancement of the health of building occupants and reductions in greenhouse gas emissions
of 2

needed to meet the statewide greenhouse gas emissions limits and sublimits established pursuant
to chapter 21N.
SECTION 3. Said section 13 of said chapter 142, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting the following paragraph:- Notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, grounds for making, altering, amending or repealing a rule or regulation under this
section or granting a variance to such a rule or regulation may include, but shall not be limited to,
the advancement of reductions in greenhouse gas emissions needed to advance the health of
building occupants and reductions in greenhouse gas emissions needed to meet the statewide
greenhouse gas emissions limits and sublimits established in chapter 21N.
of 2